Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2607
Early Childhood Program Training Fund; created; use; investment; contracts authorized.

There is hereby created the Early Childhood Program Training Fund. The fund shall be administered by the State Department of Education and shall be used to enhance, provide, and coordinate training for providers of programs. Emphasis shall be placed on the coordination of and dissemination of information about existing training opportunities. Such training may include:

(1) Programs targeted to parents needing or using child care to assist them in selecting optimum child care settings;

(2) Specialized training regarding the care of children with special needs; and

(3) Programs concerning health, safety, or developmental needs of children.

The department may contract with any public or private entity to provide such training. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1991, LB 836, § 7;

Laws 1994, LB 1066, § 28;

Laws 1995, LB 401, § 7.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.